src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3378 N 1
SFX 3378 ść dbych .
SFX 3379 N 1
SFX 3379 ść dbyś .
SFX 3380 N 1
SFX 3380 ść dby .
SFX 3381 N 1
SFX 3381 ść dłaś .
SFX 3382 N 1
SFX 3382 ść dłech .
SFX 3383 N 1
SFX 3383 ść dłeś .
SFX 3384 N 1
SFX 3384 ść d .
SFX 3385 N 1
SFX 3385 ść dzynniach .
SFX 3386 N 1
SFX 3386 ść dzynniami .
SFX 3387 N 1
SFX 3387 ść dzynnia .
SFX 3388 N 1
SFX 3388 ść dzynnie .
SFX 3389 N 1
SFX 3389 ść dzynnio .
SFX 3390 N 1
SFX 3390 ść dzynniōm .
SFX 3391 N 1
SFX 3391 ść dzynniu .
SFX 3392 N 1
SFX 3392 ść dzynniym .
SFX 3393 N 1
SFX 3393 ść dzynń .
SFX 3394 N 1
SFX 3394 ś dłaś .
SFX 3395 N 1
SFX 3395 ś dłech .
SFX 3396 N 1
SFX 3396 ś dłeś .
SFX 3397 N 1
SFX 3397 ś d .
SFX 3398 N 1
SFX 3398 ś dziōnego .
SFX 3399 N 1
SFX 3399 ś dziōne .
SFX 3400 N 1
SFX 3400 ś dziōno .
SFX 3401 N 1
SFX 3401 ś dziōnōm .
SFX 3402 N 1
SFX 3402 ś dziōnych .
SFX 3403 N 1
SFX 3403 ś dziōnyj .
SFX 3404 N 1
SFX 3404 ś dziōnymi .
SFX 3405 N 1
SFX 3405 ś dziōnymu .
SFX 3406 N 1
SFX 3406 ś dziōnym .
SFX 3407 N 1
SFX 3407 ś dziōny .
SFX 3408 N 1
SFX 3408 ś dziyni .
SFX 3409 N 1
SFX 3409 ś dzynniach .
SFX 3410 N 1
SFX 3410 ś dzynniami .
SFX 3411 N 1
SFX 3411 ś dzynnia .
SFX 3412 N 1
SFX 3412 ś dzynnie .
SFX 3413 N 1
SFX 3413 ś dzynnio .
SFX 3414 N 1
SFX 3414 ś dzynniōm .
SFX 3415 N 1
SFX 3415 ś dzynniu .
SFX 3416 N 1
SFX 3416 ś dzynniym .
SFX 3417 N 1
SFX 3417 ś dzynń .
SFX 3418 N 1
SFX 3418 eć ciach .
SFX 3419 N 1
SFX 3419 eć ciami .
SFX 3420 N 1
SFX 3420 eć cia .
SFX 3421 N 1
SFX 3421 eć ciowi .
SFX 3422 N 1
SFX 3422 eć ciōm .
SFX 3423 N 1
SFX 3423 eć ciu .
SFX 3424 N 1
SFX 3424 eć ci .
SFX 3425 N 1
SFX 3425 eć ćym .
SFX 3426 N 1
SFX 3426 ł l .
SFX 3427 N 1
SFX 3427 cieł tle .
SFX 3428 N 1
SFX 3428 cieł tłach .
SFX 3429 N 1
SFX 3429 cieł tłami .
SFX 3430 N 1
SFX 3430 cieł tła .
SFX 3431 N 1
SFX 3431 cieł tłowi .
SFX 3432 N 1
SFX 3432 cieł tłōm .
SFX 3433 N 1
SFX 3433 cieł tłōw .
SFX 3434 N 1
SFX 3434 cieł tłym .
SFX 3435 N 1
SFX 3435 cieł tły .
SFX 3436 N 1
SFX 3436 ōł ele .
SFX 3437 N 1
SFX 3437 zać żōncego .
SFX 3438 N 1
SFX 3438 zać żōnce .
SFX 3439 N 1
SFX 3439 zać żōnco .
SFX 3440 N 1
SFX 3440 zać żōncōm .
SFX 3441 N 1
SFX 3441 zać żōnc .
SFX 3442 N 1
SFX 3442 zać żōncych .
SFX 3443 N 1
SFX 3443 zać żōncyj .
SFX 3444 N 1
SFX 3444 zać żōncymi .
SFX 3445 N 1
SFX 3445 zać żōncymu .
SFX 3446 N 1
SFX 3446 zać żōncym .
SFX 3447 N 1
SFX 3447 zać żōncy .
SFX 3448 N 1
SFX 3448 ieł łach .
SFX 3449 N 1
SFX 3449 ieł łami .
SFX 3450 N 1
SFX 3450 ieł ła .
SFX 3451 N 1
SFX 3451 ieł łowi .
SFX 3452 N 1
SFX 3452 ieł łōm .
SFX 3453 N 1
SFX 3453 ieł łōw .
SFX 3454 N 1
SFX 3454 ieł łym .
SFX 3455 N 1
SFX 3455 ieł ły .
SFX 3456 N 1
SFX 3456 zieł źle .
SFX 3457 N 1
SFX 3457 y cy .
SFX 3458 N 1
SFX 3458 y ke .
SFX 3459 N 1
SFX 3459 y kich .
SFX 3460 N 1
SFX 3460 y kie .
SFX 3461 N 1
SFX 3461 y kimi .
SFX 3462 N 1
SFX 3462 y kim .
SFX 3463 N 1
SFX 3463 niec ńce .
SFX 3464 N 1
SFX 3464 t ci .
SFX 3465 N 1
SFX 3465 t e .
SFX 3466 N 1
SFX 3466 t ich .
SFX 3467 N 1
SFX 3467 t igo .
SFX 3468 N 1
SFX 3468 t ij .
SFX 3469 N 1
SFX 3469 t imi .
SFX 3470 N 1
SFX 3470 t imu .
SFX 3471 N 1
SFX 3471 t im .
SFX 3472 N 1
SFX 3472 t i .
SFX 3473 N 1
SFX 3473 t o .
SFX 3474 N 1
SFX 3474 t ōm .
SFX 3475 N 1
SFX 3475 0 ego .
SFX 3476 N 1
SFX 3476 0 ych .
SFX 3477 N 1
SFX 3477 0 yj .
SFX 3478 N 1
SFX 3478 yż eżach .
SFX 3479 N 1
SFX 3479 yż eżami .
SFX 3480 N 1
SFX 3480 yż eże .
SFX 3481 N 1
SFX 3481 yż eżōm .
SFX 3482 N 1
SFX 3482 yż eży .
SFX 3483 Y 1
SFX 3483 0 j .
PFX 3483 Y 1
PFX 3483 0 noj .
SFX 3484 N 1
SFX 3484 oj ajach .
SFX 3485 N 1
SFX 3485 oj ajami .
SFX 3486 N 1
SFX 3486 oj aje .
SFX 3487 N 1
SFX 3487 oj ajowi .
SFX 3488 N 1
SFX 3488 oj ajōm .
SFX 3489 N 1
SFX 3489 oj ajōw .
SFX 3490 N 1
SFX 3490 oj aju .
SFX 3491 N 1
SFX 3491 oj ajym .
SFX 3492 N 1
SFX 3492 tko cyj .
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 tko cyj .
PFX 3493 Y 1
PFX 3493 0 noj .
SFX 3494 N 1
SFX 3494 ōndz yndza .
SFX 3495 N 1
SFX 3495 ōndz yndzowi .
SFX 3496 N 1
SFX 3496 ōndz yndzu .
SFX 3497 N 1
SFX 3497 ōndz yndzym .
SFX 3498 N 1
SFX 3498 ōndz ynżach .
SFX 3499 N 1
SFX 3499 ōndz ynżami .
SFX 3500 N 1
SFX 3500 ōndz ynża .
SFX 3501 N 1
SFX 3501 ōndz ynże .
SFX 3502 N 1
SFX 3502 ōndz ynżōm .
SFX 3503 N 1
SFX 3503 ōndz ynży .
SFX 3504 N 1
SFX 3504 ynga ōng .
SFX 3505 N 1
SFX 3505 ciyń tniach .
SFX 3506 N 1
SFX 3506 ciyń tniami .
SFX 3507 N 1
SFX 3507 ciyń tnia .
SFX 3508 N 1
SFX 3508 ciyń tnie .
SFX 3509 N 1
SFX 3509 ciyń tniowi .
SFX 3510 N 1
SFX 3510 ciyń tniōm .
SFX 3511 N 1
SFX 3511 ciyń tniōw .
SFX 3512 N 1
SFX 3512 ciyń tniu .
SFX 3513 N 1
SFX 3513 ciyń tniym .
SFX 3514 N 1
SFX 3514 as esie .
SFX 3515 N 1
SFX 3515 ato ecie .
SFX 3516 N 1
SFX 3516 ato ot .
SFX 3517 N 1
SFX 3517 eć alibymy .
SFX 3518 N 1
SFX 3518 eć alibyście .
SFX 3519 N 1
SFX 3519 eć aliby .
SFX 3520 N 1
SFX 3520 eć alichmy .
SFX 3521 N 1
SFX 3521 eć alimy .
SFX 3522 N 1
SFX 3522 eć aliście .
SFX 3523 Y 1
SFX 3523 ć 0 .
PFX 3523 Y 1
PFX 3523 le leć .
SFX 3524 N 1
SFX 3524 o szij .
SFX 3525 Y 1
SFX 3525 o szij .
PFX 3525 Y 1
PFX 3525 0 noj .
SFX 3526 N 1
SFX 3526 ew wach .
SFX 3527 N 1
SFX 3527 ew wami .
SFX 3528 N 1
SFX 3528 ew wa .
SFX 3529 N 1
SFX 3529 ew wōm .
SFX 3530 N 1
SFX 3530 ew wōw .
SFX 3531 N 1
SFX 3531 ew wu .
SFX 3532 N 1
SFX 3532 ew wym .
SFX 3533 N 1
SFX 3533 ew wy .
SFX 3534 N 1
SFX 3534 zie źmi .
SFX 3535 N 1
SFX 3535 to cij .
SFX 3536 N 1
SFX 3536 yn nu .
SFX 3537 N 1
SFX 3537 ōnd ynda .
SFX 3538 N 1
SFX 3538 ōnd yndowi .
SFX 3539 N 1
SFX 3539 ź ziach .
SFX 3540 N 1
SFX 3540 ź ziami .
SFX 3541 N 1
SFX 3541 ź zia .
SFX 3542 N 1
SFX 3542 ź ziowi .
SFX 3543 N 1
SFX 3543 ź ziōm .
SFX 3544 N 1
SFX 3544 ź ziu .
SFX 3545 N 1
SFX 3545 ź zi .
SFX 3546 N 1
SFX 3546 ź ziym .
SFX 3547 N 1
SFX 3547 ie 0 .
SFX 3548 N 1
SFX 3548 ać ōncego .
SFX 3549 N 1
SFX 3549 ać ōnce .
SFX 3550 N 1
SFX 3550 ać ōnco .
SFX 3551 N 1
SFX 3551 ać ōncōm .
SFX 3552 N 1
SFX 3552 ać ōnc .
SFX 3553 N 1
SFX 3553 ać ōncych .
SFX 3554 N 1
SFX 3554 ać ōncyj .
SFX 3555 N 1
SFX 3555 ać ōncymi .
SFX 3556 N 1
SFX 3556 ać ōncymu .
SFX 3557 N 1
SFX 3557 ać ōncym .
SFX 3558 N 1
SFX 3558 ać ōncy .
SFX 3559 N 1
SFX 3559 owić ōwcie .
SFX 3560 N 1
SFX 3560 owić ōwmy .
SFX 3561 N 1
SFX 3561 owić ōw .
SFX 3562 N 1
SFX 3562 ōdź odziach .
SFX 3563 N 1
SFX 3563 ōdź odziami .
SFX 3564 N 1
SFX 3564 ōdź odzie .
SFX 3565 N 1
SFX 3565 ōdź odziōm .
SFX 3566 N 1
SFX 3566 ōdź odzi .
PFX 3567 N 1
PFX 3567 ł łow .
SFX 3568 N 1
SFX 3568 ōw owu .
SFX 3569 N 1
SFX 3569 yrz erzach .
SFX 3570 N 1
SFX 3570 yrz erzami .
SFX 3571 N 1
SFX 3571 yrz erze .
SFX 3572 N 1
SFX 3572 yrz erzi .
SFX 3573 N 1
SFX 3573 yrz erzōm .
SFX 3574 N 1
SFX 3574 ało ynij .
SFX 3575 Y 1
SFX 3575 ało jmynij .
PFX 3575 Y 1
PFX 3575 0 n .
SFX 3576 N 1
SFX 3576 ały yńsi .
SFX 3577 N 1
SFX 3577 ały yńszego .
SFX 3578 N 1
SFX 3578 ały yńsze .
SFX 3579 N 1
SFX 3579 ały yńszo .
SFX 3580 N 1
SFX 3580 ały yńszōm .
SFX 3581 N 1
SFX 3581 ały yńszych .
SFX 3582 N 1
SFX 3582 ały yńszyj .
SFX 3583 N 1
SFX 3583 ały yńszymi .
SFX 3584 N 1
SFX 3584 ały yńszymu .
SFX 3585 N 1
SFX 3585 ały yńszym .
SFX 3586 N 1
SFX 3586 ały yńszy .
SFX 3587 Y 1
SFX 3587 ały yńsi .
PFX 3587 Y 1
PFX 3587 0 noj .
SFX 3588 Y 1
SFX 3588 ały yńszego .
PFX 3588 Y 1
PFX 3588 0 noj .
SFX 3589 Y 1
SFX 3589 ały yńsze .
PFX 3589 Y 1
PFX 3589 0 noj .
SFX 3590 Y 1
SFX 3590 ały yńszo .
PFX 3590 Y 1
PFX 3590 0 noj .
SFX 3591 Y 1
SFX 3591 ały yńszōm .
PFX 3591 Y 1
PFX 3591 0 noj .
SFX 3592 Y 1
SFX 3592 ały yńszych .
PFX 3592 Y 1
PFX 3592 0 noj .
SFX 3593 Y 1
SFX 3593 ały yńszyj .
PFX 3593 Y 1
PFX 3593 0 noj .
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 ały yńszymi .
PFX 3594 Y 1
PFX 3594 0 noj .
SFX 3595 Y 1
SFX 3595 ały yńszymu .
PFX 3595 Y 1
PFX 3595 0 noj .
SFX 3596 Y 1
SFX 3596 ały yńszym .
PFX 3596 Y 1
PFX 3596 0 noj .
SFX 3597 Y 1
SFX 3597 ały yńszy .
PFX 3597 Y 1
PFX 3597 0 noj .
SFX 3598 N 1
SFX 3598 sło śle .
SFX 3599 Y 1
SFX 3599 0 ach .
PFX 3599 Y 1
PFX 3599 me m .
SFX 3600 Y 1
SFX 3600 0 ami .
PFX 3600 Y 1
PFX 3600 me m .
SFX 3601 Y 1
SFX 3601 0 owi .
PFX 3601 Y 1
PFX 3601 me m .
SFX 3602 Y 1
SFX 3602 0 ōm .
PFX 3602 Y 1
PFX 3602 me m .
