src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
kocieł/3426,3427,3428,3429,3430,3431,3432,3433,3434,3435
kozieł/3448,3449,3450,3451,3452,3453,3454,3455,3456
kościōł/3436,261,262,263,264,265,266,267,268
kożdy/3457,115,116,3458,3459,3460,3461,3462,118,119,85,87,88
krasiato/85,3483
kroj/3484,3485,3486,3487,3488,3489,3490,3491,1,2,108,5,6,7,10,8
krōtko/3492,3493
ksiynga/3504,121,83,86,122,103,104
ksiōndz/3494,3495,3496,3497,3498,3499,3500,3501,3502,3503
kwieciyń/3505,3506,3507,3508,3509,3510,3511,3512,3513
kōniec/935,936,937,3463,938,939,940,941,942
kōntynt/3464,3465,3466,3467,3468,3469,3470,3471,3472,3473,3474,3475,108,442,6,3476,3477,443,444,8,9
las/1,2,3,5,6,7,8,9,3514
lecieć/1097,3517,3518,3519,3520,3521,3522,1068,489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,506,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,989,527,1114,1115,1116,1117,1118,1119,1120,1121,1122,1123,1124,1125,1126,1127,1128,1129,1130,1131,1132,1133,1134,1135,3523,2128,2129
leko/3524,3525
lew/3526,3527,3528,1065,3529,3530,3531,3532,3533
ludzie/430,434,2887,3534
luto/3535,907
lyn/861,862,1048,864,865,866,3536,867,868
maciyrz/3569,3570,3571,3572,3573,1,2,108,131,6
mało/3574,3575
mały/618,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,3576,3577,3578,3579,3580,3581,3582,3583,3584,3585,3586,3587,3588,3589,3590,3591,3592,3593,3594,3595,3596,3597
mech/3599,3600,3601,3602,3603,3604,3605,3606
modziyż/3478,3479,3480,3481,3482
nakłaś/2085,1976,1977,1978,2296,3394,2297,3395,3396,2298,2299,2300,2301,2086,3263,3264,3265,3266,3267,3268,3269,3270,3271,3272,3273,3397,2087,2088,2089,2090,3398,3399,3400,3401,3402,3403,3404,3405,3406,3407,3408,3409,3410,3411,3412,3413,3414,3415,3416,3417,2091,2092,2093
nasz/4070,3,3475,108,442,6,3476,3477,443,444,8
niymało/3574,4235
pokłaś/2085,1976,1977,1978,2296,3394,2297,3395,3396,2298,2299,2300,2301,2086,3263,3264,3265,3266,3267,3268,3269,3270,3271,3272,3273,3397,2087,2088,2089,2090,3398,3399,3400,3401,3402,3403,3404,3405,3406,3407,3408,3409,3410,3411,3412,3413,3414,3415,3416,3417,2091,2092,2093
ponojś/4031,4032,4033,4034,4035,4036,4037,4038,4039,4040,4041,4042,4043,4044,4045,4046,4047,4048,4049,4050,4051,4052,4053,4054,4055,4056,4057,4058,4059,4060,4061,4062,4063,2085,2086,2087,2088,2089,2090,3398,3399,3400,3401,3402,3403,3404,3405,3406,3407,3408,2091,2092,2093
płeć/3418,3419,506,3422,3424
rodszy/4998,4999,5000,5001,5002,5003,3483,5004,5005,5006,4670,2828,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
szew/3526,3527,1065,5174,3529,3530,3531,3532,3533
taniec/935,936,937,3463,938,939,940,941,942
wasz/4070,3,3475,108,442,6,3476,3477,443,444,8
wiecheć/3418,3419,3420,506,3421,3422,3423,3424,3425
wiosło/97,92,93,99,96,100,101,3598
wiōnzać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,2118,2119,2120,2121,2122,2123,2124,3437,3438,3439,3440,3441,3442,3443,3444,3445,3446,3447,2125,2126
wyzwać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,1079,1080,1081,2441,2442,2443,1094,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,428,3548,3549,3550,3551,3552,3553,3554,3555,3556,3557,3558
zakōntynt/3464,3465,3466,3467,3468,3469,3470,3471,3472,3473,3474,3475,108,442,6,3476,3477,443,444,8,9
ôdnojś/4031,4032,4033,4034,4035,4036,4037,4038,4039,4040,4041,4042,4043,4044,4045,4046,4047,4048,4049,4050,4051,4052,4053,4054,4055,4056,4057,4058,4059,4060,4061,4062,4063,2085,2086,2087,2088,2089,2090,3398,3399,3400,3401,3402,3403,3404,3405,3406,3407,3408,2091,2092,2093
łabyńdź/3539,3540,3541,2710,3542,3543,3544,3545,3546
łabōnd/781,782,3537,3538,783,784,786,787,788
łagodnie/128,3547,129
łokeć/3418,3419,3420,506,3421,3422,3423,3424,3425
łowić/452,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,453,454,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,463,464,465,466,467,468,469,470,471,472,473,474,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297,298,299,300,301,302,303,304,305,306,307,308,309,310,475,476,477,478,479,480,481,482,483,484,485,3559,3560,3561
łōdź/3562,3563,3564,3565,3566
łōw/1581,1582,397,398,1583,3567,3568,399,1585
żōłto/907,3535
